North Carolina, session 2025, SB1092.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. Jenna Fruechtenicht Butler of the Second Judicial Division is
appointed as a Special Superior Court Judge for a term expiring December 31, 2034.
SECTION 1.2. Kent Wood of Brunswick County is appointed to the Brunswick
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.3. James Baynum III of Carteret County is appointed to the Carteret
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.4. Wayne King of Cleveland County is appointed to the Cleveland
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.5. Pete N. Burgess of Onslow County is reappointed to the Coastal
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.6. William Lewis of Craven County is appointed to the Craven
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.7. Ellen Shannon of Chatham County is appointed to the Durham
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.8. Sebastian King of Forsyth County is appointed to the Guilford
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.9. Anthony Gravanda of Halifax County is appointed to the Halifax
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.10. Dr. Alfred Mina of Haywood County is appointed to the Haywood
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.11. Brandon E. Lilley of Martin County is appointed to the Martin
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.12. Gary Stroud of McDowell County is reappointed to the McDowell
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.13. James L. Mixson III of Iredell County is appointed to the Mitchell
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.14. Catherine Wilson of Bertie County is reappointed to the
Roanoke-Chowan Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
*S1092-v-4*

SECTION 1.15. Bonita Crosser of Pamlico County is appointed to Pamlico
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.16. Pam Straughan of Jackson County is appointed to the Southwestern
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.17. Clif Robinson of Stanly County is appointed to the Stanly
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.18. Jamie Thomas of Wake County is appointed to the Wake Technical
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.19. John B. Lambe of Randolph County is appointed to the Security
Systems Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.20. Darwin Smith of Randolph County is appointed to the Security
Systems Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.21. Joshua Holloman of Johnston County is appointed to the 911 Board
for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.22. Kyle Randleman of Alexander County is reappointed to the 911
Board for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.23. Laddie B. Rice of Sampson County is reappointed to the 911 Board
for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.24. Jacqueline Mallory of Wilkes County is appointed to the 911 Board
for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.25. Madison Edwards of Randolph County is reappointed to the
Professional Educator Preparation and Standards Commission for a term expiring August 31,
2028.
SECTION 1.26. Hank Weddington of Catawba County is reappointed to the
Professional Educator Preparation and Standards Commission for a term expiring August 31,
2028.
SECTION 1.27. Deborah Resetar of Lincoln County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.28. Tiffany Hamrick of Davidson County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.29. The Honorable Brad Overcash of Gaston County is appointed to
the Education Commission of the States for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring
December 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.30. Bradley Newkirk of Wake County is reappointed to the Council of
Internal Auditing for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.31. Jack E. Bailey of Durham County is reappointed to the UNC Health
Care System Board of Directors for a term beginning November 1, 2026, and expiring October
31, 2030.
SECTION 1.32. James S. Walker of Mecklenburg County is reappointed to the
Turnpike Authority for a term beginning on January 15, 2027, and expiring on January 14, 2031.
SECTION 1.33. Commissioner Kate McCullough of Mecklenburg County is
reappointed to the License to Give Trust Fund Commission for a term expiring December 31,
2027.
SECTION 1.34. John Neidecker of Wake County is reappointed to the North
Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.35. Elizabeth Champion of Cleveland County is appointed to the
Cleveland Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the
unexpired term of Larry Hamrick, Jr.
SECTION 1.36. Peter Barnes of Wake County is appointed to the NC Innovation
Board of Directors for a term expiring September 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Cantey
Alexander.
Page 2 Session Law 2026-55 Senate Bill 1092

SECTION 1.37. Leanne Thomason of Wake County is appointed to the Acupuncture
Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of Dr. Cindi Fox
Kemp.
SECTION 1.38. Kathryn Gregg of Rockingham County is appointed to the Domestic
Violence Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.39. Steven M. Nunn of Randolph County is reappointed to the
Domestic Violence Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.40. Sarah N. Lanier of Randolph County is appointed to the Domestic
Violence Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.41. Kathleen Lockwood of Durham County is reappointed to the
Domestic Violence Commission for a term expiring August 31, 2027.
SECTION 1.42. Christine Evans of Wake County is appointed to the Roanoke Island
Historical Association, Inc., Board of Directors for a term expiring September 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.43. Carl W. Grubb of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Oil and Gas Commission for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December
31, 2030.
SECTION 1.44. Dr. Cheryl Richards of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
North Carolina State Human Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.45. Jerry Cox of Davidson County is appointed to the Home Inspector
Licensure Board for a term expiring July 1, 2030.
SECTION 1.46. Lois Welborn of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Arboretum Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.47. Dr. Christopher McDowell of Pitt County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Athletic Trainer Examiners for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.48. Vickie Gallimore of Randolph County is appointed to the North
Carolina Real Estate Commission for a term expiring July 31, 2029.
SECTION 1.49. Major General James Trogdon of Chatham County is appointed to
the North Carolina Board of Transportation to fill the unexpired term of Katherine Harrington
for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 1.50. If House Bill 268, 2025 Regular Session, becomes law, William
McBrayer of Catawba County is appointed to the Local Government Commission for a term
expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 1.51. Grant Brooks of Alamance County is reappointed to the Alamance
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.52. Jennifer Powell of Currituck County is appointed to the College of
The Albemarle Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.53. Charles "Chuck" Williams of Beaufort County is appointed to the
Beaufort Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.54. Andrew Sprenger of Union County is reappointed to the Central
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.55. Eugene Wilson Muse Jr. of Edgecombe County is appointed to the
Edgecombe Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.56. Ronna Gore of Columbus County is appointed to the Southeastern
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.57. Sherry Holt of Caswell County is appointed to the Piedmont
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.58. Aaron H. Cooper of Moore County is appointed to the Sandhills
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.59. Jeffrey L. Rowell of Union County is appointed to the South
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
Senate Bill 1092 Session Law 2026-55 Page 3

SECTION 1.60. Naomi Smith of Burke County is appointed to the Western
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.61. Dr. Cory A. Stirewalt of Rowan County is appointed to the
Professional Educators Preparation and Standards Commission for a term expiring August 31,
2028.
SECTION 1.62. Shannon Stein of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Professional Educators Preparation and Standards Commission for a term expiring August 31,
2028.
SECTION 1.63. Darrell Frye of Randolph County is appointed to the UNC Health
Care System Board of Directors for a term expiring October 31, 2028, to fill the unexpired term
of Robert Barnhill.
SECTION 1.64. Billy D. Brock of Wayne County is appointed to the Wayne
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.65. Joseph Hartsfield of Wilson County is appointed to the Wilson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.66. John S. Hahn of Wake County is appointed to the Environmental
Management Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of
Timothy Baumgartner.
SECTION 1.67. Toby Harrison of Alamance County is appointed to the Governor's
Crime Commission for a term expiring February 28, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Phil Byrd.
SECTION 1.68. Joe I. Marshall of Iredell County is appointed to the North Carolina
Banking Commission for a term expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 1.69. Bryan Peterson of Yancey County is reappointed to the Mayland
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 1.70. Adrienne A. Aiker of Durham County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Board of Examiners of Fee-Based Practicing Pastoral Counselors for a term
expiring September 30, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of Judy Y. Siker.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Linda K. Larson of Pamlico County is appointed to the Pamlico
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired
term of Gayle Hardy.
SECTION 2.2. The Honorable Stephen M. Ross of Alamance County is appointed
to the Alamance Community College Board of Trustees for a term beginning January 1, 2027,
and expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.3. Dennis H. Troy of Bladen County is appointed to the Bladen
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.4. Richard A. Leinwand of Bladen County is appointed to the Bladen
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.5. Douglas J. Dawson of Brunswick County is appointed to the
Brunswick Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.6. William L. Rogers of Carteret County is appointed to the Carteret
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.7. Lucia Zapata Griffith of Mecklenburg County is appointed to the
Central Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.8. Kenneth Ledford of Cleveland County is appointed to the Cleveland
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.9. Robert "Bobby" M. Sheegog, Jr. of Onslow County is appointed to
the Coastal Carolina Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.10. The Honorable Chadwick B. Howard of Craven County is
appointed to the Craven Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
Page 4 Session Law 2026-55 Senate Bill 1092

SECTION 2.11. Garland D. Shepheard of Edgecombe County is appointed to the
Edgecombe Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.12. James H. Baker of Cumberland County is appointed to Fayetteville
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.13. Whitney G. Tobatto of Guilford County is appointed to the Guilford
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.14. Terryll J. Evans of Haywood County is appointed to the Haywood
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.15. Steven D. Earp of Durham County is appointed to the Durham
Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.16. Niccoya Dobson of Duplin County is appointed to the James Sprunt
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.17. Garland L. Norton of McDowell County is appointed to the
McDowell Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.18. Lisa M. Qualls of Iredell County is appointed to Mitchell
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.19. Gordon M. Knowles of Montgomery County is appointed to the
Montgomery Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.20. Katherine Wiggins Fisher of Nash County is appointed to the Nash
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.21. Robert A. Lyon of Pamlico County is appointed to the Pamlico
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.22. Daniel L. Taylor of Pitt County is appointed to the Pitt Community
College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.23. Paul L. Welborn of Randolph County is appointed to the Randolph
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.24. Tammy R. Maynor of Robeson County is appointed to the Robeson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.25. Charles P. Spell II of Sampson County is appointed to the Sampson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.26. Henry J. Edmund of Columbus County is appointed to the
Southeastern Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.27. David R. Ford of Stanly County is appointed to the Stanly
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.28. Paul Lewus of Chatham County is appointed to the Wake Technical
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.29. Craig West of Wayne County is appointed to the Wayne
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.30. Gary W. Paxson of Burke County is appointed to the Western
Piedmont Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.31. Kenneth A. Jones of Wilson County is appointed to the Wilson
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.32. B. Andrew Nagle of Buncombe County is appointed to the
Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2030.
SECTION 2.33. Alvin W. Daughtridge of Caldwell County is appointed to the
Caldwell Community College and Technical Institute Board of Trustees for a term expiring June
30, 2030.
SECTION 2.34. Robert T. "Teddy" Davis III of New Hanover County is appointed
to the Cape Fear Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
Senate Bill 1092 Session Law 2026-55 Page 5

SECTION 2.35. Monica H. Gardner of Catawba County is appointed to the Catawba
Valley Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.36. Cathi H. Smith of Guilford County is appointed to the
Davidson-Davie Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.37. John M. Davenport, Jr. of Forsyth County is appointed to the
Forsyth Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.38. Dr. Shawnya A. Gore of Gaston County is appointed to the Gaston
College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.39. Barbie L. Shearin-Boyd of Halifax County is appointed to the
Halifax Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.40. Bryan King of Rutherford County is appointed to the Isothermal
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.41. Ashley P. Leggett of Martin County is appointed to the Martin
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.42. Constance C. White of Person County is appointed to the Piedmont
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.43. Michael B. Legg of Rowan County is appointed to the
Rowan-Cabarrus Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.44. H. David McLean of Moore County is appointed to the Sandhills
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.45. F. Eugene Rees of Surry County is appointed to the Surry
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.46. James C. Kelly of Lee County is appointed to the Central Carolina
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.47. Cale L. Grady of Lenoir County is appointed to the Lenoir
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.48. Edwina R. Sluder of Avery County is appointed to the Mayland
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.49. Diedra L. Evans of Hertford County is appointed to the
Roanoke-Chowan Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.50. Mark R. Jones of Jackson County is appointed to the Southwestern
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.51. W. Andrew Westmoreland of Cherokee County is appointed to the
Tri-County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.52. John "Bert" E. Hall of Wilkes County is appointed to the Wilkes
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.53. MG(R) Kurt J. Ryan of Beaufort County is appointed to the
Beaufort County Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.54. Renee P. Dowdy of Currituck County is appointed to the College
of The Albemarle Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.55. Jonathan H. Lawler of Franklin County is appointed to the
Vance-Granville Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.56. Thomas Z. Wood of Wake County is appointed to the Johnston
Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.57. Dr. Christopher T. Allgeier of Henderson County is appointed to
the Acupuncture Licensing Board for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.58. Robert M. Freeman II of Cabarrus County is appointed to the
African-American Heritage Commission for a term beginning October 1, 2026, and expiring
September 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.59. Linda O. Pryor of Henderson County is appointed to the Agriculture
Finance Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Page 6 Session Law 2026-55 Senate Bill 1092

SECTION 2.60. Nancy C. Humphries of Buncombe County is appointed to the
North Carolina Arboretum Board of Directors for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.61. Michael T. Flicker of Caldwell County, Reece C. Hayes of
Haywood County, and Dr. Garrett R. Franklin of Wake County are appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Athletic Trainer Examiners for terms beginning August 1, 2026, and expiring
July 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.62. Christine T. Knettel of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Boxing and Combat Sports Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.63. Edwin Lewis Aldridge III of Johnston County is appointed to the
Land and Water Fund Board of Trustees for a term expiring July 1, 2029.
SECTION 2.64. Bonner D. Herring of Brunswick County is appointed to the Coastal
Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.65. Tanya R. Upton of Rowan County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board of Dietetics/Nutrition for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.66. Michael J. Adams of Wake County, Dawn L. "Kriquette" Davis of
Wayne County, Kathy G. Current of Gaston County, Matthew N. Walker of Caldwell County,
George E. Wilson, Jr., of Stanly County, and Tiffany Bell of Buncombe County are appointed to
the Domestic Violence Commission for terms beginning September 1, 2026, and expiring August
31, 2028.
SECTION 2.67. April L. Adams of Wake County is appointed to the Council on
Internal Auditing for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.68. Jessica M. Grant of Cleveland County, Tara P. Knight of Johnston
County, and Diane E. Doak of Mecklenburg County are appointed to the North Carolina Board
of Interpreter and Transliterator Licensing Board for terms expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.69. Michael T. Rodgers of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Irrigation Contractor's Licensing Board for a term beginning October 1, 2026, and
expiring September 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.70. Paul Y. Coble of Wake County is appointed to the Judicial
Standards Commission for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2032.
SECTION 2.71. Andrew C. Munn of Wake County, Julia Jackson-Newson of
Guilford County, Ingrid Schunder of Forsyth County, and Michael Labor of Forsyth County are
appointed to the License to Give Trust Fund Commission for terms beginning January 1, 2027,
and expiring December 31, 2028.
SECTION 2.72. Carolyn H. Bibeau of Currituck County is appointed to the North
Carolina Marine Industrial Park Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired
term of Russell King.
SECTION 2.73. Keynan R. Phillips of Mitchell County is appointed to the North
Carolina Mining Commission for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31,
2030.
SECTION 2.74. Norman S. Staines of Caldwell County, Christy B. Shearin of
Franklin County, and the Honorable B. Phil Howell of Ashe County are appointed to the 911
Board for terms beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2030.
SECTION 2.75. Jeffery D. Link of Caldwell County, the Reverend Renne B. Bethea
of Richmond County, Dr. Laurie Stradley of Buncombe County, Lauren S. Urland of Wayne
County, and Madison S. Downing of Pitt County are appointed to the North Carolina Partnership
for Children, Inc., for terms beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.76. Michael H. Johnson of Iredell County is appointed to the North
Carolina State Ports Authority for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.77. Dr. R.W. "Bill" Griffin of Caldwell County, Dean Kimberly Winter
of Jackson County, Dr. Connie O. Locklear of Robeson County, and Darrell Pennell of Caldwell
Senate Bill 1092 Session Law 2026-55 Page 7

County are appointed to the North Carolina Professional Educator Preparation and Standards
Commission for terms beginning September 1, 2026, and expiring August 31, 2028.
SECTION 2.78. Robert J. Ramseur of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Real Estate Commission for a term beginning August 1, 2026, and expiring July 31,
2029.
SECTION 2.79. Randy O. Overton of Wake County and Paul Powell of Guilford
County are appointed to the Rules Review Commission for terms expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.80. Wesley B. Jones of Wake County is appointed to the Rules Review
Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired term of Christopher Loutit.
SECTION 2.81. Augustus H. "Gus" Tulloss of Nash County and J. Weidner
Abernethy of Watauga County are appointed to the Rural Infrastructure Authority for terms
expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.82. Steven M. Barry of Wilson County is appointed to the North
Carolina Board for Licensing of Soil Scientists for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 2.83. Keith A. Hindman of Caldwell County is appointed to the Board of
Trustees of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees for a term expiring June 30,
2028.
SECTION 2.84. Commissioner Dennis R. Aldridge of Avery County is appointed
to the State Water Infrastructure Authority for a term expiring July 1, 2028.
SECTION 2.85. Bobbi Jo Lazarus of Cabarrus County is appointed to the North
Carolina Turnpike Authority for a term beginning January 14, 2027, and expiring January 14,
2031.
SECTION 2.86. Justin J. Pedley of Moore County is appointed to the North Carolina
Veterinary Medical Board for a term expiring June 30, 2031.
SECTION 2.87. Edward W. Wood of Chowan County and James A. Harrell III of
Wake County are appointed to the North Carolina Youth Outdoor Engagement Commission for
terms beginning October 1, 2026, and expiring September 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.88. Anthony B. "Beau" Waddell of Henderson County, Stephen
Rosenburgh of Mecklenburg County, and the Honorable N. Leo Daughtry of Johnston County
are appointed to the North Carolina Board of Transportation for terms beginning July 31, 2026,
and expiring July 30, 2030.
SECTION 2.89. Cheryl Caulfield of Wake County is appointed to the University of
North Carolina Center for Public Media Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to
fill the unexpired term of Duane Hall.
SECTION 2.90. Dr. Sankar N. Adusumilli of Wake County is appointed to the
University of North Carolina Health Care System Board of Directors for a term beginning
November 1, 2026, and expiring October 31, 2030.
SECTION 2.91. Zachary C. Benfield of Caldwell County is appointed to the North
Carolina Wildlife Resources Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2027, to fill the unexpired
term of John Stone.
SECTION 2.92. Craig D. McMillan of Robeson County is appointed to the North
Carolina Indian Affairs Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2028.
SECTION 2.93. I. Craig Olive of Johnston County to the North Carolina Board of
Funeral Service for a term beginning January 1, 2027, and expiring December 31, 2029.
SECTION 2.94. Tyler Lane Younts of Guilford County is appointed to the Industrial
Commission for a term expiring July 30, 2032.
SECTION 2.95. Douglas L. Boyd of Beaufort County and Ben A. Shelton III of
Iredell County to the Board of Agriculture for a term expiring May 1, 2032.
SECTION 2.96. Samantha Ferguson of Jackson County to the North Carolina Arts
Council for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
Page 8 Session Law 2026-55 Senate Bill 1092

SECTION 2.97. Haywood E. "Woody" White III of New Hanover County and
Lawrence Joseph Shaheen, Jr. of Mecklenburg County to the North Carolina Interest on Lawyers'
Trust Accounts Board of Trustees for a term beginning November 1, 2026, and expiring August
31, 2029.
SECTION 2.98. James C. Burnette of Rockingham County is appointed to the
Rockingham Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2030.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.1. Section 2.4 of S.L. 2024-12 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.4. Effective July 1, 2024, Althea D. Weaver of Bladen County is appointed to
the Bladen Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2028.2027."
PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 6th day of August, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Mike Schietzelt
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Senate Bill 1092 Session Law 2026-55 Page 9